Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 1. Purpose and Applicability.

Sec. 24.60.010.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The legislature finds that

high moral and ethical standards among public servants in the legislative branch of government are essential to assure the trust, respect, and confidence of the people of this state;

a fair and open government requires that legislators and legislative employees conduct the public’s business in a manner that preserves the integrity of the legislative process and avoids conflicts of interest or even appearances of conflicts of interest;

the public’s commitment to a part-time citizen legislature requires legislators be drawn from all parts of society and the best way to attract competent people is to acknowledge that they provide their time and energy to the state, often at substantial personal and financial sacrifice;

a part-time citizen legislature implies that legislators are expected and permitted to earn outside income and that the rules governing legislators’ conduct during and after leaving public service must be clear, fair, and as complete as possible; the rules, however, should not impose unreasonable or unnecessary burdens that will discourage citizens from entering or staying in government service;

in order for the rules governing conduct to be respected both during and after leaving public service, the code must be administered fairly without bias or favoritism;

no code of conduct, however comprehensive, can anticipate all situations in which violations may occur nor can it prescribe behaviors that are appropriate to every situation; in addition, laws and regulations regarding ethical responsibilities cannot legislate morality, eradicate corruption, or eliminate bad judgment;

compliance with a code of ethics is an individual responsibility; thus all who serve the legislature have a solemn responsibility to avoid improper conduct and prevent improper behavior by colleagues and subordinates;

the purpose of this chapter is to establish standards of conduct for state legislators and legislative employees and to establish the Select Committee on Legislative Ethics to consider alleged violations of this chapter and to render advisory opinions to persons affected by this chapter;

a fair and open government requires that constituents have unencumbered access to legislators about issues important to the state under art. I, secs. 5 and 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, which protect the right of a legislator and a constituent to meet and the right of a person to petition the government, and this chapter is not intended to restrict those rights.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective May 25, 2019, added (9).

Sec. 24.60.020.
Applicability; relationship to common law and other laws.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, this chapter applies to a member of the legislature, to a legislative employee, and to public members of the committee. This chapter does not apply to

a former member of the legislature or to a person formerly employed by the legislative branch of government unless a provision of this chapter specifically states that it applies;

a person elected to the legislature who at the time of election is not a member of the legislature.

The provisions of this chapter specifically supersede the provisions of the common law relating to legislative conflict of interest that may apply to a member of the legislature or a legislative employee. This chapter does not supersede or repeal provisions of the criminal laws of the state. This chapter does not exempt a person from applicable provisions of another law unless the law is expressly superseded or incompatibly inconsistent with the specific provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; §§ 2, 3 ch 113 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 167 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 18 ch 47 SLA 2007)